el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης προστατευτικού χεριών: Άκρο τιμονιού (1 σημείου); Άκρο τιμονιού (2 σημείων); Μόνο σφιγκτήρας τιμονιού; Βάση σε μανέτα; Βάση καθρέπτη; Τιμονόπλακα / βάση στο πιρούνι; Βάση με ιμάντα / δεματικά γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
tr: El koruyucu montaj tipi: Gidon ucu (1 noktalı); Gidon ucu (2 noktalı); Yalnızca gidon kelepçesi; Manet mesnedi bağlantısı; Ayna bağlantısı; Üçlü mesnet/çatal bağlantısı; Evrensel kayış/kablo bağı bağlantısı; Diğer
pt-BR: Protetor de mão montagem tipo: Extremidade do guidão (1 ponto); Extremidade do guidão (2 pontos); Apenas abraçadeira de guidão; Suporte de manete; Suporte de espelho; Mesa / suporte de bengala; Cinta universal / braçadeira; Outro
vi: Loại lắp đặt bộ bảo vệ tay: Đầu ghi đông (1 điểm); Đầu ghi đông (2 điểm); Chỉ dùng kẹp ghi đông; Gắn bệ đòn bẩy; Gắn gương; Gắn chạc ba / phuộc; Gắn dây đai vạn năng / dây thít; Khác
zh-TW: 護手安裝類型: 把手末端 (單點); 把手末端 (雙點); 僅把手夾鉗; 拉桿座安裝; 後照鏡座安裝; 三角台 / 前叉安裝; 通用綁帶 / 束線帶安裝; 其他
es: Tipo de montaje del protector de manos: Extremo del manubrio (1 punto); Extremo del manubrio (2 puntos); Solo abrazadera de manubrio; Montaje en soporte de palanca; Montaje de espejo; Abrazadera triple/montaje de horquilla; Correa universal/montaje con bridas; Otro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งการ์ดป้องกันมือ: ปลายแฮนด์ (1 จุด); ปลายแฮนด์ (2 จุด); แคลมป์รัดแฮนด์เท่านั้น; ยึดกับประกับก้านคลัตช์/เบรก; ยึดกับกระจกมองหลัง; แผงคอ / ยึดโช้ค; สายรัดอเนกประสงค์ / เคเบิ้ลไทร์; อื่นๆ
ja: ハンドガード取り付けタイプ: バーエンド (1点留め); バーエンド (2点留め); ハンドルバークランプのみ; レバーパーチマウント; ミラーマウント; トリプルクランプ/フォークマウント; ユニバーサルストラップ/結束バンドマウント; その他
ro-RO: Tip de montare apărătoare de mână: Capăt de ghidon (1 punct); Capăt de ghidon (2 puncte); Doar clemă pentru ghidon; Montare pe suportul manetei; Montare pe oglindă; Jug / montare pe furcă; Curea universală / montare cu colier de plastic; Altele
ko: 핸드가드 장착형: 바 엔드(1포인트); 바 엔드(2포인트); 핸들바 클램프 전용; 레버 퍼치 마운트; 미러 마운트; 트리플 클램프/포크 마운트; 범용 스트랩/케이블 타이 마운트; 기타
lt-LT: Rankų apsaugos tvirtinimo tipas: Vairo galas (1 taško); Vairo galas (2 taškų); Tik vairo spaustukas; Svirties laikiklio tvirtinimas; Veidrodėlio laikiklis; Trigubas spaustukas / šakės laikiklis; Universalus dirželis / užtraukiamasis dirželis; Kita
nl: Handbeschermer bevestiging type: Bar-end (1-punts); Bar-end (2-punts); Alleen stuurklem; Hendelbeugel-bevestiging; Spiegelbevestiging; Kroonplaat- / vorkbevestiging; Universele band- / tiewrapbevestiging; Overig
nb: Monteringstype for håndbeskyttelse: Styreende (1-punkts); Styreende (2-punkts); Kun styreklemme; Hendelfeste; Speilfeste; Gaffelkrone-/gaffelfeste; Universell stropp / stripsfeste; Annet
it: Tipo di fissaggio del paramano: Estremità manubrio (1 punto); Estremità manubrio (2 punti); Solo morsetto manubrio; Supporto a collare della leva; Supporto specchietto; Piastra di sterzo/supporto forcella; Cinturino universale/fascetta; Altro
cs: Typ montáže chrániče rukou: Na konec řídítek (1bodová); Na konec řídítek (2bodová); Pouze objímka na řídítka; Na objímku páčky; Na zrcátko; Na brýle vidlice / vidlici; Univerzální pásek / montáž stahovací páskou; Jiný
ru: Тип крепления защиты рук: В торец руля (1 точка); В торец руля (2 точки); Только зажим на руль; Крепление на кронштейн рычага; Крепление на зеркало; Крепление на траверсу/вилку; Универсальный ремень/стяжка; Другое
fi: Käsisuojan kiinnitystapa: Ohjaustangon pää (1 piste); Ohjaustangon pää (2 pistettä); Vain ohjaustangon kiinnike; Kahvarungon kiinnitys; Peilikiinnitys; T-kappale / haarukkakiinnitys; Yleismallinen hihna- / nippusidekiinnitys; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve ščitnika za roke: Konec krmila (1-točkovno); Konec krmila (2-točkovno); Samo objemka krmila; Nosilec ročice; Nosilec ogledala; T-križ/nosilec vilic; Univerzalni trak/pritrditev z vezicami; Drugo
da: Monteringstype for håndbeskytter: Styr-ende (1-punkts); Styr-ende (2-punkts); Kun styrklemme; Montering på greb; Montering på spejl; Tredobbelt klemme / montering på gaffel; Montering med universalrem/strips; Andet
fr: Type de montage des protège-mains: Embout de guidon (1 point); Embout de guidon (2 points); Collier de guidon uniquement; Support de cocotte de levier; Support de rétroviseur; Té de fourche/support de fourche; Sangle universelle/attache autobloquante; Autre
zh-CN: 护手安装类型: 把端（单点）; 把端（两点）; 仅车把夹; 拉杆座安装; 后视镜座安装; 三联板/前叉安装; 通用绑带/束线带安装; 其他
pl: Typ mocowania osłony dłoni: Na końcu kierownicy (1-punktowe); Na końcu kierownicy (2-punktowe); Tylko zacisk na kierownicę; Montaż na obejmie klamki; Montaż do lusterka; Montaż do półki / widelca; Uniwersalny montaż na pasek / opaskę zaciskową; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže štitnika za ruku: Kraj volana (1 točka); Kraj volana (2 točke); Samo obujmica za volan; Nosač na držaču ručice; Nosač retrovizora; Trostruka obujmica / nosač za vilicu; Univerzalni remen / nosač s vezicom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на предпазителя за ръка: Край на кормилото (1 точка); Край на кормилото (2 точки); Само скоба за кормило; Монтаж на конзолата на лоста; Монтаж на огледалото; Тройник / монтаж на вилката; Универсална лента / монтаж със свинска опашка; Друго
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia chrániča rúk: Na konce riadidiel (1-bodové); Na konce riadidiel (2-bodové); Len objímka na riadidlá; Montáž na objímku páčky; Montáž na zrkadlo; Montáž na okuliare / vidlicu; Univerzálny popruh / upevnenie sťahovacou páskou; Iné
hu: Kézvédő rögzítési típusa: Kormányvég (1 pontos); Kormányvég (2 pontos); Csak kormánybilincs; Fék-/kuplungkar konzolos rögzítés; Tükörre szerelhető; Kifli / villa rögzítés; Univerzális hevederes / kábelkötegelős rögzítés; Egyéb
en: Hand guard mounting type: Bar-end (1-point); Bar-end (2-point); Handlebar clamp only; Lever perch mount; Mirror mount; Triple clamp / fork mount; Universal strap / zip-tie mount; Other
de: Montageart des Handschutzes: Lenkerende (1-Punkt); Lenkerende (2-Punkt); Nur Lenkerklemme; Befestigung an der Hebelarmatur; Spiegelhalterung; Gabelbrücke/Gabelhalterung; Universalgurt-/Kabelbinderhalterung; Sonstige
pt-PT: tipo de montagem do protetor de mãos: Extremidade do guiador (1 ponto); Extremidade do guiador (2 pontos); Apenas braçadeira de guiador; Suporte na manete; Suporte no espelho; Abraçadeira tripla / suporte na forqueta; Tira universal / montagem com braçadeiras; Outro
sv: Monteringstyp för handskydd: Styrände (1-punkts); Styrände (2-punkts); Endast styrklämma; Greppfäste; Spegelfäste; Gaffelkrona/gaffelfäste; Universell rem/buntbandsfäste; Övrigt